Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 16.52.310 and 2023 c 208 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person may not own, possess, control, or otherwise have charge or custody of more than ((50))20 dogs with intact sexual organs over the age of six months at any time.(2) Any person who owns, possesses, controls, or otherwise has charge or custody of more than ((10))four dogs with intact sexual organs over the age of six months and keeps the dogs in an enclosure for the majority of the day must at a minimum:(a) Provide space to allow each dog to turn about freely, to stand, sit, and lie down. The dog must be able to lie down while fully extended without the dog's head, tail, legs, face, or feet touching any side of an enclosure and without touching any other dog in the enclosure when all dogs are lying down simultaneously. The interior height of the enclosure must be at least ((six))12 inches higher than the head of the tallest dog in the enclosure when it is in a normal standing position. Each enclosure must be at least ((three))five times the length and width of the longest dog in the enclosure, from tip of nose to base of tail and shoulder blade to shoulder blade.(b) Provide each dog that is over the age of four months with a minimum of ((one))two exercise ((period))periods during each day for a total of not less than ((one hour))two hours of exercise during such day. Such exercise must include either leash walking or giving the dog access to an enclosure at least four times the size of the minimum allowable enclosure specified in (a) of this subsection allowing the dog free mobility for the entire exercise period, but may not include use of a cat mill, jenny mill, slat mill, or similar device, unless prescribed by a doctor of veterinary medicine. The exercise requirements in this subsection do not apply to a dog certified by a doctor of veterinary medicine as being medically precluded from exercise.(c) Maintain adequate housing facilities and primary enclosures that meet the following requirements at a minimum:(i) Housing facilities and primary enclosures must be kept in a sanitary condition. Housing facilities where dogs are kept must be sufficiently ventilated at all times to minimize odors, drafts, ammonia levels, and to prevent moisture condensation. Housing facilities must have a means of fire suppression, such as functioning fire extinguishers, on the premises and must have sufficient lighting to allow for observation of the dogs at any time of day or night;(ii) Housing facilities must enable all dogs to remain dry and clean;(iii) Housing facilities must provide shelter and protection from extreme temperatures and weather conditions that may be uncomfortable or hazardous to the dogs;(iv) Housing facilities must provide sufficient shade to shelter all the dogs housed in the primary enclosure at one time;(v) A primary enclosure must have floors that are constructed in a manner that protects the dogs' feet and legs from injury;(vi) Primary enclosures must be placed no higher than ((forty-two))42 inches above the floor and may not be placed over or stacked on top of another cage or primary enclosure;(vii) Feces, hair, dirt, debris, and food waste must be removed from primary enclosures at least daily or more often if necessary to prevent accumulation and to reduce disease hazards, insects, pests, and odors; and(viii) All dogs in the same enclosure at the same time must be compatible, as determined by observation. Animals with a vicious or aggressive disposition must never be placed in an enclosure with another animal, except for breeding purposes. Breeding females in heat may not be in the same enclosure at the same time with sexually mature males, except for breeding purposes. Breeding females and their litters may not be in the same enclosure at the same time with other adult dogs. Puppies under ((twelve))12 weeks may not be in the same enclosure at the same time with other adult dogs, other than the dam or foster dam unless under immediate supervision.(d) Provide dogs with easy and convenient access to adequate amounts of clean food and water. Food and water receptacles must be regularly cleaned and sanitized. All enclosures must contain potable water that is not frozen, is substantially free from debris, and is readily accessible to all dogs in the enclosure at all times.(e) Provide veterinary care without delay when necessary. A dog may not be bred if a veterinarian determines that the animal is unfit for breeding purposes. Only dogs between the ages of ((twelve))12 months and eight years of age may be used for breeding. Animals requiring euthanasia must be euthanized only by a licensed veterinarian.(3) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(4) This section does not apply to the following:(a) A publicly operated animal control facility or animal shelter;(b) A private, charitable not-for-profit humane society or animal adoption organization;(c) A veterinary facility;(d) A retail pet store;(e) A research institution;(f) A boarding facility; or(g) A grooming facility.(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(a) "Dog" means any member of Canis lupus familiaris; and(b) "Retail pet store" means a commercial establishment that engages in a for-profit business of selling at retail cats, dogs, or other animals to be kept as household pets and is regulated by the United States department of agriculture.--- END ---